test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_1_tie_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tie - ok : # Noun 'vei' n_1  - ok
     tie+N+Sg+Nom: tie
     tie+N+Sg+Gen: tien
     tie+N+Sg+Par: tietä
     tie+N+Sg+Tra: tieksi
     tie+N+Sg+Abe: tiettä
     tie+N+Sg+Ine: tiessä
     tie+N+Sg+Ela: tiestä
     tie+N+Sg+Ill: tiehen
     tie+N+Sg+Ade: tielä
     tie+N+Sg+Abl: tieltä
     tie+N+Sg+All: tiele
     tie+N+Sg+Ess: tienä
     tie+N+Pl+Nom: tiet
     tie+N+Pl+Gen: [teitten, teinen] #teinen vain Por. varieteetissä
     tie+N+Pl+Par: teitä
     tie+N+Pl+Tra: teiksi
     tie+N+Pl+Abe: teittä
     tie+N+Pl+Ine: teissä
     tie+N+Pl+Ela: teistä
     tie+N+Pl+Ill: teihin
     tie+N+Pl+Ade: teilä
     tie+N+Pl+Abl: teiltä
     tie+N+Pl+All: teile
     tie+N+Pl+Ess: teinä
     tie+N+Pl+Com: teine
